Illinois, session 104th, HB5421.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 340B 5Integrity Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "340B contract pharmacy" means a pharmacy with which a 8340B covered entity has contracted to dispense 340B drugs on 9behalf of the 340B covered entity to patients of the 340B 10covered entity, regardless of whether the 340B drugs are 11distributed in person, via mail, or by other means.12    "340B covered entity" has the meaning given to that term 13in 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4).14    "340B drug" means a covered outpatient drug, as defined in 1542 U.S.C. 1396r-8(k)(2), that has been subject to any offer 16for reduced prices by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 17256b(a)(1) and is purchased by a 340B covered entity.18    "340B drug discount program" means the federal drug 19pricing program described in 42 U.S.C. 256b.20    "340B profits" means the difference between the aggregated 21payments received from insurers, payers, or self-paying 22patients for all 340B drugs and the aggregated acquisition 23cost paid for all 340B drugs.  HB5421- 2 -LRB104 20390 BAB 33850 b1    "Charity care" has the meaning given to that term in line 223 of worksheet S-10 to the Medicare cost report or in any 3successor form. 4    "Covered outpatient drug" means a covered outpatient drug, 5as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396r-8(k)(2).6    "Low-income patient" means a patient of a 340B covered 7entity with a family income below 200% of the poverty 8guidelines updated periodically in the Federal Register by the 9U.S. Department of Health and Human Services under the 10authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2). 11    Section 10. Medical assistance carveout. Beginning January 121, 2027, 340B covered entities shall not bill any medical 13assistance fee-for-service or medical assistance managed care 14programs under the Illinois Public Aid Code for 340B drugs, 15including, but not limited to, billing for any 340B drugs 16dispensed at a 340B contract pharmacy. 17    Section 15. Use of 340B profits. 18    (a) Beginning July 1, 2026, a 340B covered entity shall 19use 80% of 340B profits from the prior year to decrease at the 20point of sale, including at the 340B contract pharmacy, the 21out-of-pocket costs paid for 340B drugs that are dispensed or 22administered to low-income patients of the 340B covered 23entity. 24    (b) A 340B covered entity shall use any remaining 340B   HB5421- 3 -LRB104 20390 BAB 33850 b1profits, after spending 340B profits in accordance with 2subsection (a), on free and discounted care for low-income 3patients of the 340B covered entity. 4    Section 20. 340B drug discount program reporting. 5    (a) On or before September 1, 2026 and on or before 6September 1 of each year thereafter, each 340B covered entity 7shall annually report to the Department of Insurance, with 8respect to the 340B covered entity and separately for each 9offsite outpatient facility associated with the 340B covered 10entity, the following information about the prior year, in a 11form and manner determined by the Department:12        (1) delineated by form of insurance or payor type, 13    including, but not limited to, Medicaid, Medicare, 14    commercial insurance, and uninsured:15            (A) the aggregated acquisition cost paid for all 16        340B drugs;17            (B) the aggregated payments received by insurers 18        or payors for all 340B drugs; and19            (C) the total number of prescriptions and 20        percentage of the 340B covered entity's prescriptions 21        that were filled with 340B drugs;22            (D) the percentage of patients served by a sliding 23        fee scale for 340B drugs at the point of sale for 24        patients with family incomes less than 200% of the 25        Federal Poverty Guidelines;  HB5421- 4 -LRB104 20390 BAB 33850 b1        (2) the total operating costs of the 340B covered 2    entity and itemized costs for:3            (A) implementing direct pass-through of 340B 4        program discounts to patients in the form of lower 5        cost sharing for 340B drugs at the point of dispensing 6        or administration;7            (B) implementing a sliding fee scale for 340B 8        drugs at the point of sale for patients with family 9        incomes less than 200% of the poverty guidelines 10        updated periodically in the Federal Register by the 11        U.S. Department of Health and Human Services under the 12        authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2); and13            (C) charity care;14        (3) the total payments made to:15            (A) 340B contract pharmacies for 340B 16        program-related services and other functions;17            (B) third-party administrators for managing any 18        components of the 340B covered entity's 340B program; 19        and20            (C) any other third parties in connection with 21        340B program-related compliance, legal, educational, 22        or administrative costs;23        (4) the total number of 340B contract pharmacies and:24            (A) the number of 340B contract pharmacies located 25        out-of-state and the states in which the out-of-state 26        340B contract pharmacies are located;  HB5421- 5 -LRB104 20390 BAB 33850 b1            (B) the total number of prescriptions and the 2        percentage of the 340B covered entity's prescriptions 3        that were filled at 340B contract pharmacies, 4        delineated by in-state and out-of-state 340B contract 5        pharmacies;6            (C) the total remuneration paid to or retained by 7        340B contract pharmacies or their affiliates for any 8        340B program-related services performed on behalf of 9        the 340B covered entity; and10            (D) the percentage change in paragraph (3) of 11        subsection (a) compared to the prior year.12    (b) An officer of the 340B covered entity shall certify 13the completeness and accuracy of the report submitted pursuant 14to subsection (a).15    (c) On or before December 31, 2026 and on or before 16December 31 of each year thereafter, the Department shall post 17all reports submitted by 340B covered entities pursuant to 18subsection (a) on a publicly accessible website. 19    Section 25. Employer study. On or before December 31, 202026, the Department of Central Management Services shall 21submit a report to the General Assembly on any impact to the 22State employee health plan arising from 340B covered entity 23purchases, 340B contract pharmacy arrangements, and general 24practices related to 340B drugs, regardless of whether the 25340B drugs were self-administered or provider-administered.   HB5421- 6 -LRB104 20390 BAB 33850 b1The report shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of 2foregone rebates, the impact on premiums, and the impact to 3State employee out-of-pocket costs. 4    Section 30. Medical assistance study. 5    (a) On or before December 31, 2026, the Department of 6Healthcare and Family Services shall report to the General 7Assembly on the following for total aggregated covered 8outpatient drug units dispensed or administered in the State 9for the prior calendar year in connection with the medical 10assistance program under the Illinois Public Aid Code, broken 11out by fee-for-service and by each managed care plan: 12        (1) the number of dispensed or administered covered 13    outpatient drug units; 14        (2) the number of dispensed or administered covered 15    outpatient drug units that were subject to a rebate under 16    42 U.S.C. 1396r-8; 17        (3) the number of dispensed or administered covered 18    outpatient drug units where for which pricing was obtained 19    by the 340B covered entity and the number of units billed 20    by 340B contract pharmacies; and 21        (4) the reasonable estimate of net costs or savings to 22    the State's medical assistance program due to 340B covered 23    entity purchases of covered outpatient drug units at 340B 24    pricing.25    (b) To the extent the Department lacks a required item   HB5421- 7 -LRB104 20390 BAB 33850 b1under subsection (a), the Department shall provide a 2reasonable estimate based on all available information and an 3explanation of the information that the Department lacks. 4    Section 35. Claims data. Nothing in this Act shall deny, 5restrict, or prohibit a manufacturer from requiring a 340B 6covered entity to provide claims information for the 7manufacturer's 340B drugs. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.